Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.13, is amended to read: 342.13 LOCAL CONTROL. (a) A local unit of government may not prohibit the possession, transportation, or use of cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products authorized under this chapter. (b) Except as provided in section 342.22, a local unit of government may not prohibit the establishment or operation of a cannabis business or hemp business licensed under this chapter. (c) new text begin By ordinance, new text end a local unit of government may adopt reasonable restrictions on the time, place, and manner of the operation of a cannabis business provided that such restrictions do not prohibit the establishment or operation of cannabis businesses. A local unit of government may prohibit the operation of a cannabis business within 1,000 feet of a school, or 500 feet of a day care, residential treatment facility, or an attraction within a public park that is regularly used by minors, including a playground or athletic field. (d) The office shall work with local units of government to: (1) develop model ordinances for reasonable restrictions on the time, place, and manner of the operation of a cannabis business; (2) develop standardized forms and procedures for the issuance of a retail registration pursuant to section 342.22; and (3) develop model policies and procedures for the performance of compliance checks required under section 342.22. deleted text begin (e) If a local unit of government is conducting studies or has authorized a study to be conducted or has held or has scheduled a hearing for the purpose of considering adoption or amendment of reasonable restrictions on the time, place, and manner of the operation of a cannabis business, the governing body of the local unit of government may adopt an interim ordinance applicable to all or part of its jurisdiction for the purpose of protecting the planning process and the health, safety, and welfare of its citizens. Before adopting the interim ordinance, the governing body must hold a public hearing. The interim ordinance may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the operation of a cannabis business within the jurisdiction or a portion thereof until January 1, 2025. deleted text end deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end Within 30 days of receiving a copy of an application from the office, a local unit of government shall certify on a form provided by the office whether a proposed cannabis business complies with local zoning ordinances and, if applicable, whether the proposed business complies with the State Fire Code and new text begin the State new text end Building Code. The office deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not issue a licensenew text begin to an applicantnew text end if the local unit of government informs the office that thenew text begin proposednew text end cannabis business does not deleted text begin meetdeleted text end new text begin comply withnew text end local zoning deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ordinances,new text end land use lawsnew text begin , the State Fire Code, or the State Building Code and submits evidence of the proposed cannabis business's lack of compliancenew text end . If the local unit of government does not provide the certificationnew text begin under this paragraphnew text end to the office within 30 days of receiving a copy of an application from the office, the office may new text begin waive the requirement for local government certification and may new text end issue a licensenew text begin to the applicant. Regardless of whether the office has waived local government certification, the proposed cannabis business's location must meet the requirements of this chapternew text end . deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end The office by rule shall establish an expedited complaint process to receive, review, and respond to complaints made by a local unit of government about a cannabis business. At a minimum, the expedited complaint process shall require the office to provide an initial response to the complaint within seven days and perform any necessary inspections within 30 days. Nothing in this paragraph prohibits a local unit of government from enforcing a local ordinance. If a local unit of government notifies the office that a cannabis business other than a cannabis retailer, cannabis microbusiness, cannabis mezzobusiness or lower-potency hemp edible retailer with a retail operations endorsement, or medical cannabis combination business operating a retail location poses an immediate threat to the health or safety of the public, the office must respond within one business day and may take any action described in section 342.19 or 342.21. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end A local government unit that issues a cannabis retailer registration under section 342.22 may, by ordinance, limit the number of licensed cannabis retailers, cannabis mezzobusinesses with a retail operations endorsement, and cannabis microbusinesses with a retail operations endorsement to no fewer than one registrationnew text begin , plus one additional registrationnew text end for every 12,500 residents.new text begin After each increment of 12,500 residents, the number of required registrations must be rounded up to the next whole number of registrations.new text end deleted text begin (i) If a county has one active registration for every 12,500 residents, a city or town within the county is not obligated to register a cannabis business. deleted text end new text begin (h) A county that has consent from a city or town to issue retail registrations for the jurisdiction according to section 342.22, subdivision 1, may develop a process, in consultation with the consenting city or town, for issuing retail registrations throughout the county that meets the required minimum in paragraph (g) and limits the number of registrations allowed in each city or town that has delegated authority to the county. new text end deleted text begin (j)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end Nothing in this section shall prohibit a local government unit from allowing licensed cannabis retailers in excess of the minimums set in paragraph deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end . deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, the state shall not issue a license to any cannabis business to operate in Indian country, as defined in United States Code, title 18, section 1151, of a Minnesota Tribal government without the consent of the Tribal government. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.14, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Completed application; final authorization; issuance of license. (a) Within 18 months of receiving notice of preliminary license approval, an applicant must provide: (1) the address and legal property description of the location where the business will operate; (2) the name of the local unit of government where the business will be located; and (3) if applicable, an updated description of the location where the business will operate, an updated security plan, and any other additional information required by the office. (b) Upon receipt of the information required under paragraph (a) from an applicant that has received preliminary license approval, the office must: (1) forward a copy of the application to the local unit of government in which the business operates or intends to operate with a form for certification as to whether a proposed cannabis business complies with local zoning ordinances and, if applicable, whether the proposed business complies with the state fire code and building code; (2) schedule a site inspection; and (3) require the applicant to pay the applicable license fee. (c) The office may deny final authorization if: (1) an applicant fails to submit any required information; (2) the applicant submits a materially false statement about the applicant or fails to provide any required information; (3) the office confirms that the cannabis business for which the office granted a preliminary license approval does not meet local zoning and land use laws; (4) the applicant fails to pay the applicable license fee; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (5) the office determines that the applicant is disqualified from holding the license or would operate in violation of the provisions of this chapterdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (6) the applicant fails to demonstrate that the proposed cannabis business's location complies with local zoning ordinances, the State Fire Code, or the State Building Code. new text end (d) Within 90 days of receiving the information required under paragraph (a) and the results of any required background check, the office shall grant final authorization and issue the appropriate license or send the applicant a notice of rejection setting forth specific reasons that the office did not approve the application. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.22, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Compliance checks. (a) A local unit of government shall conduct compliance checks of every cannabis business and hemp business with a retail registration issued by the local unit of government. During a compliance check, a local unit of government shall assess a business's compliance with age verification requirements and compliance with any applicable local ordinance established pursuant to section 342.13. (b) A local unit of government must conduct unannounced age verification compliance checks of every cannabis business and hemp business at least once each calendar year. Age verification compliance checks must involve persons at least 17 years of age but under the age of 21 who, with the prior written consent of a parent or guardian if the person is under the age of 18, attempt to purchase adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products under the direct supervision of a law enforcement officer or an employee of the local unit of government. new text begin (c) A local government with retail registration authority that performs compliance checks must annually submit data regarding compliance checks to the office. The data must include: new text end new text begin (1) the name of the cannabis business and the business's address, license number, and type of business under chapter 342; new text end new text begin (2) the results of the compliance check, including whether the business was compliant with any applicable local ordinances; new text end new text begin (3) the date and time of the compliance check; new text end new text begin (4) a description of any specific violation of a local ordinance, including any failure to request documentation for age verification, an age verification method that violates this chapter, or any other violation of a local ordinance; and new text end new text begin (5) any warnings, fines, suspensions, or other actions taken by the local government in response to the business's violation of a local ordinance. new text end new text begin (d) A local government may provide the office with data from a compliance check before the annual submission date. A local government may provide the office with data from a compliance check by notifying the office of a suspended retail registration according to subdivision 5, paragraph (a). new text end